Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 27. Child Support Services Agency.
Sec. 25.27.075.
Employment information.

An employer doing business in the state shall report to the agency the hiring, rehiring, or return to work of each employee. The report shall be made within the time limits set out in (b) of this section. The report must contain the name, address, and social security number of the newly hired employee, the name and address of the employer, and the identifying number assigned to the employer by the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service. Violation of this subsection does not give rise to a private cause of action.

An employer required to report under (a) of this section shall use the following procedures to make the report:

if the report is submitted magnetically or electronically, the report shall be made in a format mutually agreed upon by the employer and the agency; an employer reporting under this paragraph shall make two transmissions a month, not less than 12 days nor more than 16 days apart; or

if the report is not submitted magnetically or electronically, the report shall be made on a United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, W-4 form or, at the option of the employer, on an equivalent form; an employer reporting under this paragraph shall make the report to the agency not later than 20 days after the date of the hiring, rehiring, or return to work of the employee; the report shall be transmitted by the employer by first class mail.

An employer that does business in this state and that has employees in at least one other state is not required to comply with (a) of this section if, in compliance with the laws of that state, the employer

submits timely magnetic or electronic reports of hires, rehires, or returns to work to the state directory of new hires of another state in which the employer has employees; and

has provided written notification of its election under this subsection to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

In addition to reporting under (a) of this section, an employer of an obligor shall promptly provide to the agency, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, information requested regarding the obligor’s compensation, employment, wages or salary, and occupation.

An employer may charge $1 to each employee who is reported to the agency under this section to cover the cost of the reporting.

In addition to other sanctions available under the law, an employer that violates this section is liable for a civil penalty for each failure to meet the requirements of this section of not more than

$10 for each employee who is newly hired, rehired, or newly returned to work; and

$100 if the failure is the result of a conspiracy between the employee and the employer not to supply the required report or to supply a false or incomplete report concerning an employee.

In this section,

“employee” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 3401(c); “employee” does not include an employee of a federal or state agency performing intelligence or counterintelligence functions if the head of that agency has determined that reporting under this section on the employee could endanger the safety of the employee or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence mission;

“employer” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 3401(d); “employer” includes a governmental entity and a labor organization;

“labor organization” has the meaning given in 29 U.S.C. 152; “labor organization” includes an entity that is used by the labor organization and another employer to carry out hiring or other requirements described in 29 U.S.C. 158(f)(3) in accordance with an agreement between the labor organization and the other employer.

History.

(§ 9 ch 40 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 75 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 25 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 11 ch 54 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.075. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments to this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts. For applicability of the 1998 amendments, see § 55, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.27.080.
Enforcement of support orders.

A court order requiring payment of child support shall be modified to order payments be made to the agency upon application.

The agency on behalf of the custodian or the state shall take all necessary action permitted by law to enforce child support orders, including petitioning the court for orders to aid in the enforcement of child support.

The determination or enforcement of a duty of support is unaffected by any interference by the custodian of the child with rights of custody or visitation granted by a court. When the agency appears on behalf of a child in an action seeking to establish or enforce support, the court may not adjudicate custody, visitation, or property rights in the same action.

An order of arrest may not be issued in the enforcement of child support unless the court has reason to believe that the obligor may flee the jurisdiction or unless the obligor has been ordered to appear in the action and has failed to do so.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 23 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 108 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.080. Renumbered in 1990. In 1977 the term “obligor” was substituted for “obligee” in two locations in (d) of this section to correct a manifest error in ch. 126, SLA 1977.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Sec. 25.27.085.
Subpoenas.

The agency may subpoena persons, books, records, and documents to

obtain any financial or other information needed to establish, modify, or enforce a child support order;

determine the paternity of a child under AS

25.27.165

; or

disestablish the paternity of a child under AS

25.27.166

.

An administrative subpoena issued under this section shall be served in the manner provided for service of liens under AS

25.27.240

. Proof of service may be completed according to Rule 5, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

A person who is issued an administrative subpoena shall be provided an opportunity to refuse to comply with it for good cause by filing a request for a conference with the agency in this state in the manner and within the time specified in regulations adopted by the agency. Good cause shall be limited to mistake in identity of the person or to a prohibition under law to release such information.

After a conference requested under (c) of this section, the agency shall issue an order on the request relating to good cause. If the person continues to refuse to comply with the administrative subpoena, the agency in this state shall issue an order to impose a civil penalty of $10 for each day of noncompliance with the subpoena.

An order imposing a civil penalty under this section is a final administrative decision and may be appealed under AS

25.27.210

.

This section does not limit the ability of the agency to make other lawful requests for information.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued under this section, the agency may apply to the court for an order to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as if the subpoena had been issued by a court.

History.

(§ 8 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 83, 84 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 26 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.085. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For immunity for certain actions relating to child support, see AS

09.65.250

.

Sec. 25.27.086.
Subpoenas issued by agency of another state.

If the child support enforcement agency of another state issues a subpoena regarding persons, books, records, or documents in this state, the subpoena must be complied with as if it were issued by this state’s child support services agency if

the subpoena is for obtaining

financial or other information needed to establish, modify, or enforce a support order; or

information needed to determine or disestablish the paternity of a child under the laws of the state in which the subpoena was issued; and

the issuing agency complied with AS

25.27.085(b)

.

The procedures in or adopted under AS

25.27.085(c)

and (d) apply to a person who is issued a subpoena described in (a) of this section.

The child support services agency of this state shall enforce a subpoena described in (a) of this section and shall provide the opportunity for conference and issue any order under AS

25.27.085(c)

and (d) on behalf of the issuing agency. AS

25.27.085(e)

applies to an order under this subsection.

The penalties provided in AS

25.27.085

apply regarding a subpoena described in (a) of this section.

Nothing in this section limits the ability of a child support enforcement agency of another state to make other lawful requests for information in this state.

History.

(§ 85 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in subsection (a), “this state’s child support enforcement agency” was changed to “this state’s child support services agency” and in subsection (c), “child support enforcement agency of this state” was changed to “child support services agency of this state” in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For immunity for certain actions relating to child support, see AS

09.65.250

.

Sec. 25.27.090.
Reducing arrears to judgment. [Repealed, § 24 ch 126 SLA 1977. Formerly AS 47.23.090.]

Sec. 25.27.095.
Agency exempt from execution.

Execution may not issue against money held in the fund established under AS

25.27.030

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 126 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.095. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.100.
All persons may use agency.

The agency shall provide aid to any person due child support under the laws of this state upon application. The agency may, by regulation, impose a fee for services provided under this chapter.

[Repealed, § 148 ch 87 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 26 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 9 ch 68 SLA 1988; am §§ 14, 15 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am §§ 86, 148 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.100. Renumbered in 1990.

Legislative history reports. —

For Senate letter of intent relating to SB 117, from which ch. 68, SLA 1988 derives, see 1987 Senate Journal 729 — 730.

Sec. 25.27.103.
Payments to agency.

An obligor shall make child support payments to the agency if the agency is enforcing a duty of child support under AS 25.25 or this chapter. The agency shall disburse that portion of a payment that exceeds the amount of money necessary to satisfy the obligor’s immediate duty of support in accordance with state and federal requirements. The agency may characterize a support payment physically received by the agency through wage withholding during the last five business days of the month as having been received on the first day of the next calendar month if the agency determines that the payment was made in the course of regular wage withholding intended for the next calendar month. The agency shall credit money disbursed under this section toward satisfaction of the obligor’s duty of support.

History.

(§ 7 ch 118 SLA 1982; am § 87 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 12 ch 54 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.23.100(b). Renumbered as AS 47.23.103 in 1982. Renumbered again in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.105.
Audit of collections.

Within 30 working days after receipt of a written request from an obligor, the obligor’s legal representative, the obligee, or the obligee’s legal representative, the agency shall provide an audit of all child support payments made by the obligor and received by the agency. The audit shall include the date and amount of each payment, the name of the obligee, and the total amount of arrearages of support past due and amount of unpaid penalties and interest imposed under AS

25.27.020(a)(2)(B)

. The agency is required to provide only one audit each year for each obligee and obligor under this section.

History.

(§ 8 ch 118 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 68 SLA 1988; am § 88 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.105. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.107.
Certification of arrears.

Within 30 days after receipt of a written request from an obligee or an obligee’s personal representative, the agency shall provide the obligee with a document that certifies whether or not the obligor was, at the end of the most recent calendar year,

in arrears under the support order in an amount more than four times the monthly obligation under the order in cases where a payment schedule has not been established for payment of continuing support and accumulated arrears under the support order; or

in arrears under a payment schedule in an amount more than four times the monthly obligation under the payment schedule if a payment schedule has been established for payment of continuing support and accumulated arrears under the support order.

History.

(§ 27 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.27.110.
[Renumbered as AS 25.27.900.]

Sec. 25.27.120.
Obligor liable for public assistance furnished obligee.

An obligor is liable to the state in the amount of assistance granted under AS 47.07 and AS 47.27 to a child to whom the obligor owes a duty of support except that, if a support order has been entered, the liability of the obligor for assistance granted under AS 47.27 may not exceed the amount of support provided for in the support order, and, if a medical order of support has been entered, the liability of the obligor for assistance granted under AS 47.07 may not exceed the amount of support provided for in the medical order of support.

An obligor is liable to the state in the amount of the cost incurred if the state is maintaining a child to whom the obligor owes a duty of support in a foster home or institution, except that if a support order has been entered, or an agreement for payment of that cost executed between the obligor and the state, the liability of the obligor may not exceed the amount provided in the support order or agreement.

Within 30 days after the agency knows the identity and address of an obligor who resides in the state and who is liable to the state under this section, the agency shall send written notification by certified mail to the obligor and the obligee of the obligor’s accruing liability and that the obligor shall make child support payments to the agency. The notice required under this subsection must be in clear, concise, and easily readable language. The notice may accompany other communications by the agency.

If the agency fails to comply with (c) of this section, interest does not accrue on the liability to the state unless a support order or medical support order, as applicable, has been entered.

The agency’s failure to comply with (c) of this section does not bar an action by the state to recover amounts owed by the obligor.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1990; am §§ 9, 10 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 15 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 89 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.120. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For assignment of support rights by applicants for the Alaska Temporary Assistance program, see AS

47.27.040

.

Sec. 25.27.125.
Accounting and disposition of federal receipts and agency collections.

Federal incentive payments received by the state under 42 U.S.C. 658 shall be deposited in the general fund and the commissioner of administration shall separately account for the payments. The annual estimated balance in the account may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the Department of Revenue to carry out the purposes of AS

25.27.020

.

The annual estimated balance in the account maintained by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the Department of Health and Social Services to carry out the purposes of AS

47.14.100

—

47.14.130

and AS 47.27.

History.

(§ 93 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 16 ch 107 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.125. Renumbered in 1990.

Editor’s notes. —

42 U.S.C. 658, referred to in subsection (a), was repealed in 2001; current corresponding provisions may be found in section 658a.

Sec. 25.27.130.
Subrogation of state.

If the obligor is liable to the state under AS

25.27.120(a)

or (b), the state is subrogated to the rights of the obligee to

bring an action in the superior court seeking an order of support;

proceed under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.270

to establish a duty of support; or

enforce by execution, in accordance with AS

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

, or otherwise, a support order entered in favor of the obligee.

To establish or enforce an order of support, including, if applicable, a medical support order, based on the subrogation of the state, the agency is not limited to the amount of assistance being granted to the child.

The recovery of any amount for which the obligor is liable that exceeds the total assistance granted under AS 47.07 and AS 47.27 shall be paid to the obligee.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, if the obligee is not receiving assistance under AS 47.07 or AS 47.27 at the time the state recovers money in an action under this section, the recovery of any amount for which the obligor is liable shall be distributed to the obligee for support payments, including medical support payments, that have become due and unpaid since the termination of assistance under AS 47.07 or AS 47.27 under a support order in favor of the obligee.

After payment to the obligee under (d) of this section, the state may retain an amount not to exceed the total unreimbursed assistance paid on behalf of the obligee under AS 47.07 or AS 47.27.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, the state shall, if required under federal law or regulations, distribute amounts recovered through offset of the obligor’s federal tax refund as past due support with first distribution to the state for unpaid support assigned to the state under AS

47.07.025

and AS

47.27.040

.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1991; am § 13 ch 117 SLA 1992; am §§ 11 — 15 ch 102 SLA 1994; am §§ 17 — 20 ch 107 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.130. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.135.
Limitation on actions to establish child support obligation.

If the same causes of action concerning a duty of child support are pending concurrently in court and before the agency, the second action filed may be abated upon the motion of a party or the agency. The court or the agency may award full costs and attorney fees to the party prevailing on the abatement motion.

History.

(§ 11 ch 68 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.135. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.140.
Authority and procedures to administratively establish and enforce support obligation.

If a support order has not been entered, the agency may establish paternity and a duty of support, which may include periodic payments of support, a medical support order, or both, utilizing the procedures prescribed in AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

and may enforce a duty of support utilizing the procedure prescribed in AS

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

. Action under this subsection may be undertaken upon application of an obligee, or at the agency’s own discretion if the obligor is liable to the state under AS

25.27.120(a)

or (b).

If a support order has been entered, the agency may enforce the support order utilizing the procedures prescribed in AS

25.27.062

,

25.27.150

, and

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

.

Unless the agency is establishing only a medical support order, a decision of the agency determining a duty of support shall include an income withholding order as provided under AS

25.27.062

.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 16 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am § 13 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 10, 11 ch 106 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.140. Renumbered in 1990. In 1990, “withholding order” was substituted for “assignment order” in subsection (c) to correct a drafting oversight in ch. 40, SLA 1985.

Administrative Code. —

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

For paternity, see 15 AAC 125, art. 3.

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Sec. 25.27.150.
Initiation of administrative enforcement of orders; required notice.

If an arrearage occurs under a support order being enforced by the agency for which immediate income withholding is not required under AS

25.27.062(a)

or an application is made to the agency for withholding under AS

25.27.062(d)

, the agency may execute an income withholding order without prior notice to the obligor. At the time of execution, the agency shall serve a notice of income withholding on the obligor. Notice under this subsection shall be served upon the obligor by certified mail to the obligor’s last known address, and service is complete when the notice is properly addressed, certified, and mailed.

The notice must state the amount of the overdue support that is owed, if any, and the amount of income that will be withheld.

The notice shall inform the obligor that income withholding has been ordered and of the procedures to follow if the obligor wishes to contest withholding on the grounds that the withholding is improper due to a mistake of fact. The notice must also inform the obligor of the information that was provided to the employer in the document that ordered the withholding.

If the obligor requests a hearing, it shall be conducted under the department’s regulations for informal conferences and shall be held within 15 days of the date of the request. The hearing may only be held to determine if there is a mistake of fact that makes the income withholding order improper because the amount of current or overdue support is incorrect, the identity of the obligor is inaccurate, or, for initiated withholding based on AS

25.27.062(c)(3)(A)

, the alleged facts regarding overdue payments or potential withdrawal of assets are incorrect. The order is not subject to any other legal defenses. It is not a defense to an income withholding order issued under AS

25.27.062(c)(2)

that less than one full month’s payment is past due if at least one full month’s payment was past due on the date notice was served under this section.

The conference officer shall inform the obligor of the informal conference decision either at the informal conference hearing or within 15 days after the hearing.

If the conference officer determines that withholding will continue, the obligor may request a formal hearing as provided in the department’s regulations.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 10 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 12 ch 68 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am §§ 90 — 93 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.150. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Sec. 25.27.160.
Initiation of administrative action to establish support duty; required notice.

An action to establish a duty of support authorized under AS

25.27.140(a)

is initiated by the agency serving on the alleged obligor a notice and finding of financial responsibility. The notice and finding served under this subsection shall be served personally or by registered, certified, or insured mail, return receipt requested, for restricted delivery only to the person to whom the notice and finding is directed or to the person authorized under federal regulation to receive that person’s restricted delivery mail.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the notice and finding of financial responsibility served under (a) of this section must state

the sum or periodic payments for which the alleged obligor is found to be responsible under this chapter;

the name of the alleged obligee and the obligee’s custodian;

that the alleged obligor may appear and show cause in a hearing held by the agency why the finding is incorrect, should not be finally ordered, and should be modified or rescinded, because

no duty of support is owed; or

the amount of support found to be owed is incorrect;

that, if the person served with the notice and finding of financial responsibility does not request a hearing within 30 days, the property and income of the person will be subject to execution under AS

25.27.062

and

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

in the amounts stated in the finding without further notice or hearing.

If the agency is establishing only medical support, the notice and finding of financial responsibility must state

that health care insurance shall be provided for the child to whom the duty of support is owed if health care insurance is available to the alleged obligor at a reasonable cost and that the alleged obligor and the other parent shall share equally the cost of the health care insurance and the costs of reasonable health care expenses not covered by insurance;

the sum of periodic payments of cash medical support for which either parent or both parents are found to be responsible under this chapter;

the name of the alleged obligee and the obligee’s custodian;

that the alleged obligor may appear and show cause in a hearing held by the agency why the finding is incorrect, should not be finally ordered, and should be modified or rescinded, because

no duty of support is owed;

health care insurance for the child is not available to the alleged obligor at a reasonable cost;

adequate health care is available to the child through the Indian Health Service or other insurance coverage; or

there is good cause to allocate the costs of health insurance, cash medical support, or uninsured health care expenses unequally between the parents;

that, if the person served with the notice under this subsection does not request a hearing within 30 days, a copy of the medical support order will be sent to the person’s employer under AS

25.27.063(b)

without further notice or hearing for inclusion of the child in family health coverage if it is available through the person’s employer.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 18 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am § 94 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 12, 13 ch 106 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 45 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.160. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

For administrative establishment of child support orders, see 15 AAC 125, art. 2.

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (c), in the introductory language, substituted “only medical support” for “only a medical support order”; added (2), redesignated former (2), (3), and (4) as (3), (4), and (5), and in (4)(D), added “cash medical support,” following “costs of health insurance”; made stylistic changes.

Sec. 25.27.165.
Determination of paternity in an administrative proceeding.

Upon application from a mother, custodian, putative father, or legal custodian of a child, or from a state, the agency may institute administrative proceedings to determine the paternity of a child born out of wedlock.

In order to initiate a paternity proceeding administratively, the agency shall serve a mother and putative father, as appropriate, with a notice of paternity and financial responsibility. The notice shall be served personally as set out in Rule 4(d), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, or by registered, certified, or insured mail, return receipt requested, for restricted delivery only to the person to whom the notice is directed or to the person authorized under federal law to receive that person’s restricted delivery mail. The notice must be accompanied by

an administrative order requiring that the mother, child, and putative father submit to genetic testing to be arranged by the agency and stating that a party may provide information to show good cause not to order the testing;

an administrative order requiring the putative father to provide financial information, as defined by the agency in regulation, within 30 days after service of the notice; all financial information provided to the agency under an order under this paragraph shall be held confidential by the agency, according to any applicable regulations; and

a notice of right to informal conference, to be held within 20 days after receipt of an admission of paternity or service upon the parties of genetic test results.

A person served with a notice of paternity and financial responsibility and accompanying orders under (b) of this section shall file a response, admitting or denying paternity and providing the required financial information, within 30 days after the date of service of the notice of paternity and financial responsibility. If the putative father admits paternity, the agency shall issue, within 20 days after the admission of paternity, a decision establishing paternity. If the putative father denies paternity, the putative father shall submit to genetic testing, as provided in (b) of this section, within 45 days after the date of service of the notice of paternity and financial responsibility. If the putative father fails to file a response or fails to comply with an accompanying order within the time and in the manner required in this subsection, the agency may issue a decision by default establishing paternity and financial responsibility, except that, if the proceeding was instituted at the request of the putative father, the agency shall dismiss the proceeding without prejudice.

Upon receipt of genetic test results, the agency shall serve on the putative father notice of the test results and of the date for the informal conference. Service of the notice shall be made by first class mail. If the genetic test results are negative under the standard set in AS

25.20.050(d)

, the agency shall issue a finding of nonpaternity within 20 days after the agency’s receipt of the test results. If the genetic test results are positive under the standard set in AS

25.20.050(d)

, the agency shall issue an informal conference decision within 20 days after the agency’s receipt of the test results. Upon request and advance payment by a party, the agency shall order additional genetic tests. If the second genetic test results contradict the first genetic test results, the agency shall provide copies of the second genetic test results to the parties and conduct another informal conference. The agency shall issue the second informal conference decision within 20 days after the agency’s receipt of the second genetic test results.

If the agency issues a decision establishing paternity under (d) of this section, the putative father is entitled to a formal hearing if a written request for hearing is served on the agency by certified mail, return receipt requested, within 30 days after the date of service of the agency’s decision.

If a request for a formal hearing is made under (e) of this section, an execution under AS

25.27.062

and

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

may not be stayed unless the putative father posts security or a bond in the amount of child support that would have been due under the informal conference decision pending the decision on the formal hearing. If no request for a formal hearing is made under (e) of this section, the informal conference decision establishing paternity is final.

If a request for a formal hearing is made under (e) of this section, the hearing officer shall consider the evidence applying the standards set in AS

25.20.050(d)

.

If a putative father who requests a formal hearing under (e) of this section fails to appear at the formal hearing, the hearing officer shall enter a final decision establishing paternity.

The agency may recover any costs it pays for genetic tests required by this section from the putative father unless the testing establishes that the individual is not the father, except that costs may not be recovered from a person who is a recipient of cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under AS 47.27 (Alaska temporary assistance program). For purposes of this subsection, a person who receives a diversion payment and self-sufficiency services under AS

47.27.026

is not considered to be a recipient of cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under AS 47.27.

A decision establishing paternity or an admission of paternity under this section must include the social security numbers, if ascertainable, of the father, mother, and the child.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the agency determines, after considering the best interests of the child, that good cause exists not to order genetic testing under this section, it shall, without ordering the genetic testing and as the agency determines appropriate in the best interests of the child,

end the administrative proceedings under this section without making a determination of paternity; or

after a hearing provided for under regulations adopted by the agency, enter a final decision regarding paternity.

History.

(§ 14 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 21 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 95 —99 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 28, 29 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For paternity, see 15 AAC 125, art. 3.

Sec. 25.27.166.
Disestablishment of paternity.

The agency shall, by regulation, establish procedures and standards for the disestablishment of paternity of a child whose paternity was established in this state other than by court order if the paternity was not established by

genetic test results that met the standard set out in AS

25.20.050(d)

at the time the test was performed; or

an acknowledgment of paternity under AS

25.20.050

or an admission of paternity under AS

25.27.165

.

The agency’s standards and procedures under (a) of this section must

allow a person to petition the agency to disestablish paternity only once per child;

allow a petition to disestablish paternity to be brought only within three years after the child’s birth or three years after the petitioner knew or should have known of the father’s putative paternity of the child, whichever is later; and

provide standards and notice and hearing procedures that are equivalent to those used for establishment of paternity under AS

25.27.165

.

The agency shall disestablish paternity under this section if genetic test results are negative under the standard set out in AS

25.20.050(d)

and if the other standards established in its regulations are met.

If a decision under this section disestablishes paternity, the petitioner’s child support obligation or liability for public assistance under AS

25.27.120

is modified retroactively to extinguish arrearages for child support and accrued liability for public assistance based on the alleged paternity that is disestablished under this section. This subsection may be implemented only to the extent not prohibited by federal law.

The costs of genetic testing under this section shall be assessed against the petitioner if paternity is not disestablished. If paternity is disestablished under this section, the costs of genetic testing shall be assessed against

the individual to whom the petitioner paid or owed child support payments for the child for whom paternity was disestablished; or

the agency if there is no individual who meets the description in (1) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 14 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 100 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For effect of (d) of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 90.3, see §§ 23 and 25, ch. 57, SLA 1995.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For administrative establishment of child support orders, see 15 AAC 125, art. 2.

For paternity, see 15 AAC 125, art. 3.

Sec. 25.27.167.
Contempt of order for genetic testing.

If a person who is located in this state fails to comply with an order for genetic testing issued by the agency in this state, or the tribunal of another state, the agency in this state may certify the facts to the superior court of this state.

Upon certification under (a) of this section, the court shall issue an order directing the person to appear and show cause why the person should not be punished for contempt. The order and a copy of the certified statement shall be served on the person in the manner required for service of court orders to show cause.

After service under (b) of this section, the court has jurisdiction of the matter brought under this section.

The law of this state applicable to contempt of a court order applies to a proceeding for contempt of an order for genetic testing brought under this section.

History.

(§ 30 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.